Utah statutes.
76-10-603.   Use of name without consent on stationery or as one who
contributed to organization prohibited.
It is a violation of this part to use, without written consent, the name of a
person for the purpose of soliciting contributions if the person's name is
listed on any stationery, advertisement, brochure, or correspondence of a
charitable organization, or his name is listed or referred to as one who has
contributed to, sponsored, or endorsed the charitable organization or its
activities.
